Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202583-1,100
Parole officer compensation.

Parole officers shall be compensated with salaries substantially equal to other state employees who have similar responsibilities, including employees of the Office of Probation Administration. This section shall apply only to field parole service officers and support staff and shall not apply to the director or any other management-level position.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 31, p. 3088;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 92;

Laws 2015, LB598, § 28;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 98;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 25;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 30;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 140.